da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Cykling > Cykler: BMX-cykler; Løbecykler; Bycykler; Cross Country-cykler; Cruiser-cykler; Cykelcross-cykler; El-cykler; Fatbikes; Foldecykler; Fragtcykler; Gravelcykler; Hybridcykler; Børnecykler; Mountainbikes; Liggecykler; Landevejscykler; Tandemcykler; Touringcykler; Sporcykler
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Cyklistika > Jízdní kola: Jízdní kola BMX; Odrážedla; Městská jízdní kola; Cross-country kola; Cestovní kola; Cyklokrosová kola; Elektrická jízdní kola; Fatbike; Skládací jízdní kola; Nákladní jízdní kola; Gravel kola; Hybridní jízdní kola; Dětská kola; Horská jízdní kola; Lehokola; Silniční jízdní kola; Tandem Bikes; Turistická kola; Treková a trekingová kola
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Ciclismo > Biciclette: Biciclette BMX; Biciclette senza pedali; Biciclette da città; Biciclette da fondo; Biciclette cruiser; Biciclette da ciclocross; Biciclette elettriche; Fatbike; Biciclette pieghevoli; Biciclette da trasporto; Biciclette gravel; Biciclette ibride; Biciclette per bambini; Mountain bike; Biciclette reclinate; Biciclette da strada; Biciclette tandem; Biciclette da cicloturismo; Biciclette da pista
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Bisiklet > Bisikletler: BMX Bisikletleri; Denge bisikletleri; Şehir Bisikletleri; Kros Bisikletleri; Cruise Bisikletleri; Cyclocross bisikletleri; Elektrikli Bisikletler; Fatbike'lar; Katlanır Bisikletler; Yük Bisikletleri; Gravel bisikletleri; Hibrit Bisikletler; Çocuk bisikletleri; Dağ Bisikletleri; Yatay bisikletler; Yol Bisikletleri; Tandem Bisikletler; Tur bisikletleri; Pist Bisikletleri
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Ciclismo > Bicicletas: Bicicletas de BMX; Bicicletas de equilíbrio; Bicicletas urbanas; Bicicletas todo-o-terreno; Bicicletas cruiser; Bicicletas de ciclocrosse; Bicicletas elétricas; Bicicletas de pneu largo; Bicicletas dobráveis; Bicicletas de carga; Bicicletas de gravel; Bicicletas híbridas; Bicicletas de criança; Bicicletas de montanha; Bicicletas reclinadas; Bicicletas de estrada; Bicicletas tandem; Bicicletas de cicloturismo; Bicicletas de trilho
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Fietsen > Fietsen: BMX-fietsen; Loopfietsen; Stadsfietsen; Crosscountryfietsen; Cruiserfietsen; Cyclocrossfietsen; Elektrische fietsen; Fatbikes; Vouwfietsen; Transportfietsen; Gravelbikes; Hybride fietsen; Kinderfietsen; Mountainbikes; Ligfietsen; Racefietsen; Tandemfietsen; Toerfietsen; Baanfietsen
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Vélo > Vélos: Vélos BMX; Draisiennes; Vélos de ville; Vélos tout-terrain; Vélos de croisière; Vélos de cyclo-cross; Vélos électriques; Fatbikes; Vélos pliants; Vélos cargo; Vélos de gravel; Vélos hybrides; Vélos pour enfants; Vélos de montagne; Vélos couchés; Vélos de route; Vélos tandem; Vélos de randonnée; Vélos de piste
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 自行车用品 > 自行车: 小轮自行车; 平衡车; 城市自行车; 越野自行车; 海滩自行车; 公路越野自行车; 电动自行车; 胖胎自行车; 折叠自行车; 拉货自行车; 砾石自行车; 混合动力自行车; 儿童自行车; 山地自行车; 躺式自行车; 公路自行车; 双人自行车; 旅行自行车; 场地自行车
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Bicyklovanie > Bicykle: BMX bicykle; Odrážadlá; Mestské bicykle; Trekové bicykle; Motorky; Cyklokrosové bicykle; Elektrické bicykle; Bicykle Fatbike; Skladacie bicykle; Nákladné bicykle; Gravelové bicykle; Hybridné bicykle; Detské bicykle; Horské bicykle; Lehokoľajové bicykle; Cestné bicykle; Tandemové bicykle; Cestovné bicykle; Dráhové bicykle
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ποδηλασία > Ποδήλατα: Ποδήλατα BMX; Ποδήλατα ισορροπίας; Ποδήλατα πόλης; Ποδήλατα Cross Country; Ποδήλατα Cruiser; Ποδήλατα Cyclocross; Ηλεκτρικά ποδήλατα; Ποδήλατα με χοντρά ελαστικά; Αναδιπλούμενα ποδήλατα; Ποδήλατα φορτίου; Ποδήλατα Gravel; Υβριδικά ποδήλατα; Παιδικά ποδήλατα; Ποδήλατα βουνού; Ξαπλωτά ποδήλατα (Recumbent); Ποδήλατα δρόμου; Διπλά ποδήλατα; Ποδήλατα Touring; Ποδήλατα πίστας
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Колоездене > Велосипеди: Велосипеди BMX; Балансиращи велосипеди; Градски велосипеди; „Крос кънтри“ велосипеди; Туристически велосипеди; Циклокрос велосипеди; Електрически велосипеди; Велосипеди „фатбайк“; Сгъваеми велосипеди; Товарни велосипеди; Гравел велосипеди; Хибридни велосипеди; Детски велосипеди; Планински велосипеди; Лежащи велосипеди; Шосейни велосипеди; Тандемни велосипеди; Туристически велосипеди; Пистови велосипеди
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Езда на велосипеде > Велосипеды: BMX-велосипеды; Беговелы; Городские велосипеды; Велосипеды для кросс-кантри; Велосипеды-круизеры; Циклокроссовые велосипеды; Электровелосипеды; Фэтбайки; Складные велосипеды; Грузовые велосипеды; Гравийные велосипеды; Гибридные велосипеды; Детские велосипеды; Горные велосипеды; Лигерады (рикамбенты); Шоссейные велосипеды; Тандемы; Туристические велосипеды; Трековые велосипеды
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > サイクリング > 自転車: BMXバイク; バランスバイク; シティバイク; クロスカントリーバイク; クルーザーバイク; シクロクロスバイク; 電動自転車; ファットバイク; 折りたたみ自転車; 荷物運搬用自転車; グラベルバイク; ハイブリッドバイク; キッズバイク; マウンテンバイク; リカンベントバイク; ロードバイク; タンデムバイク; ツーリングバイク; トラックバイク
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Kolesarjenje > Kolesa: Kolesa BMX; Poganjalci; Mestna kolesa; Kros kolesa; Kolesa za prosti čas; Kolesa za ciklokros; Električna kolesa; Kolesa z debelimi gumami; Zložljiva kolesa; Tovorna kolesa; Gravel kolesa; Hibridna kolesa; Otroška kolesa; Gorska kolesa; Ležeča kolesa; Cestna kolesa; Tandemska kolesa; Potovalna kolesa; Dirkalna kolesa
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Kerékpározás > Kerékpárok: BMX kerékpárok; Futóbiciklik; Városi kerékpárok; Országúti kerékpárok; Cirkáló kerékpárok; Cyclocross kerékpárok; Elektromos kerékpárok; Fatbike-ok; Összecsukható kerékpárok; Teherszállító kerékpárok; Gravel kerékpárok; Hibrid kerékpárok; Gyerekkerékpárok; Hegyi kerékpárok; Fekvőkerékpárok; Közúti kerékpárok; Tandemkerékpárok; Túrakerékpárok; Pályakerékpárok
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Đạp xe > Xe đạp: Xe đạp BMX; Xe đạp thăng bằng; Xe đạp thành phố; Xe đạp băng đồng; Xe đạp Cruiser; Xe đạp Cyclocross; Xe đạp điện; Xe đạp bánh to; Xe đạp gấp; Xe đạp chở hàng; Xe đạp gravel; Xe đạp hybrid; Xe đạp trẻ em; Xe đạp leo núi; Xe đạp nằm; Xe đạp đường trường; Xe đạp đôi; Xe đạp touring; Xe đạp đua
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Kolarstwo > Rowery: Rowery BMX; Rowery biegowe; Rowery miejskie; Rowery przełajowe; Rowery turystyczne; Rowery przełajowe; Rowery elektryczne; Rowery Fatbike; Rowery składane; Rowery towarowe; Rowery gravelowe; Rowery hybrydowe; Rowery dziecięce; Rowery górskie; Rowery poziome; Rowery szosowe; Rowery tandemowe; Rowery turystyczne; Rowery torowe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Ciclismo > Bicicletas: Bicicletas BMX; Bicicletas de equilibrio; Bicicletas urbanas; Bicicletas de cross; Bicicletas de crucero; Bicicletas de ciclocross; Bicicletas eléctricas; Bicicletas gordas; Bicicletas plegables; Bicicletas de carga; Bicicletas de gravel; Bicicletas híbridas; Bicicletas infantiles; Bicicletas de montaña; Bicicletas reclinadas; Bicicletas de carretera; Bicicletas tándem; Bicicletas de turismo; Bicicletas de pista
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปั่นจักรยาน > จักรยาน: จักรยานบีเอ็มเอ็กซ์; จักรยานทรงตัว; จักรยานซิตี้ไบค์; จักรยานครอสคันทรี่; จักรยานครุยเซอร์; จักรยานไซโคลครอส; จักรยานไฟฟ้า; จักรยานล้อโต; จักรยานพับ; จักรยานบรรทุกสินค้า; จักรยานกราเวล; จักรยานไฮบริด; จักรยานเด็ก; จักรยานเสือภูเขา; จักรยานเอนปั่น; จักรยานเสือหมอบ; จักรยานสองตอน; จักรยานทัวร์ริง; จักรยานประเภทลู่
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사이클링 > 자전거: BMX 자전거; 밸런스 바이크; 도심형 자전거; 크로스컨트리 자전거; 크루저 자전거; 사이클로크로스 자전거; 전기 자전거; 팻바이크; 접이식 자전거; 화물용 자전거; 그래블 자전거; 하이브리드 자전거; 아동용 자전거; 산악자전거; 리컴번트 자전거; 로드자전거; 2인승 자전거; 투어링 자전거; 트랙 자전거
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 單車 > 自行車: BMX 自行車; 滑步車; 城市自行車; 越野自行車; 休閒自行車; 越野公路車; 電動自行車; 胖胎自行車; 折疊自行車; 載貨自行車; 礫石車; 混合式自行車; 兒童自行車; 登山自行車; 斜躺自行車; 公路自行車; 協力車; 旅行自行車; 競速自行車
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sykling > Sykler: BMX-sykler; Balansesykler; Bysykler; Cross Country-sykler; Cruisingsykler; Cyclocross-sykler; Elektriske sykler; Fatbikes; Foldbare sykler; Fraktesykler; Grussykler; Hybridsykler; Barnesykler; Terrengsykler; Liggesykler; Landeveissykler; Tandemsykler; Tursykler; Banesykler
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Cycling > Bicycles: BMX Bikes; Balance Bikes; City Bikes; Cross Country Bikes; Cruiser Bikes; Cyclocross Bikes; Electric Bikes; Fatbikes; Folding Bikes; Freight Bicycles; Gravel Bikes; Hybrid Bikes; Kids' Bikes; Mountain Bikes; Recumbent Bikes; Road Bikes; Tandem Bikes; Touring Bikes; Track Bikes
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Radfahren > Fahrräder: BMX-Fahrräder; Laufräder; Citybikes; Cross-Country-Fahrräder; Cruiser-Fahrräder; Cyclocross-Räder; Elektrofahrräder; Fatbikes; Falträder; Lastenfahrräder; Gravel-Bikes; Hybridfahrräder; Kinderfahrräder; Mountainbikes; Liegeräder; Rennräder; Tandemfahrräder; Tourenräder; Bahnräder
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Cykling > Cyklar: BMX-cyklar; Balanscyklar; Stadscyklar; Cross country-cyklar; Cruisingcyklar; Cyclocrosscyklar; Elcyklar; Fatbikes; Hopfällbara cyklar; Fraktcyklar; Gravelbikes; Hybridcyklar; Barncyklar; Mountainbikes; Liggcyklar; Landsvägscyklar; Tandemcyklar; Touringcyklar; Bancyklar
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Biciklizam > Bicikli: BMX bicikli; Bicikli za ravnotežu; Gradski bicikli; Cross country bicikli; Cruiser bicikli; Ciklokros bicikli; Električni bicikli; Terenski bicikl; Sklopivi bicikli; Transportni bicikli; Gravel bicikli; Hibridni bicikli; Dječji bicikli; Brdski bicikli; Ležeći bicikli; Cestovni bicikli; Tandem bicikli; Turistički bicikli; Bicikli za trkače staze
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Pyöräily > Polkupyörät: BMX-pyörät; Potkupyörät; Kaupunkipyörät; Maastopyörät; Retkipyörät; Cyclocross-pyörät; Sähköpyörät; Läskipyörät; Kokoontaittuvat pyörät; Rahtipyörät; Gravel-pyörät; Hybridipyörät; Lasten pyörät; Vuoripyörät; Nojapyörät; Maantiepyörät; Tandempyörät; Retkipyörät; Kilpapyörät
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Dviračių sportas > Dviračiai: BMX dviračiai; Balansiniai dviračiai; Miesto dviračiai; Turistiniai dviračiai; Kruiziniai dviračiai; Ciklokroso dviračiai; Elektriniai dviračiai; Plačiaračiai dviračiai; Sulankstomi dviračiai; Krovininiai dviračiai; Žvyrkelio dviračiai; Hibridiniai dviračiai; Vaikiški dviračiai; Kalnų dviračiai; Gulimieji dviračiai; Plento dviračiai; Tandeminiai dviračiai; Turistiniai dviračiai; Lenktyniniai dviračiai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Ciclismo > Bicicletas: Bicicletas BMX; Bicicletas de equilíbrio; Bicicletas urbanas; Bicicletas Cross Country; Bicicletas Cruiser; Bicicletas de ciclocross; Bicicletas elétricas; Bicicletas de pneus grossos; Bicicletas dobráveis; Bicicletas para carga; Bicicletas gravel; Bicicletas híbridas; Bicicletas infantis; Mountain Bikes; Bicicletas reclinadas; Bicicletas de estrada; Bicicletas duplas; Bicicletas de cicloturismo; Bicicletas de trilha
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Ciclism > Biciclete: Biciclete BMX; Biciclete fără pedale; Biciclete de oraș; Biciclete cross-country; Biciclete de croazieră; Biciclete de ciclocros; Biciclete electrice; Biciclete tip fatbike; Biciclete pliabile; Biciclete de transport de marfă; Biciclete gravel; Biciclete hibrid; Biciclete pentru copii; Biciclete tip mountain bike; Biciclete orizontale; Biciclete de stradă; Biciclete tandem; Biciclete de turism; Biciclete de pistă